Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2604
Tax Commissioner; reports; contents; when due.

(1) Every stamping agent, wholesale dealer, and retail dealer who is subject to sections 77-2601 to 77-2623 shall make and file with the Tax Commissioner, on or before the fifteenth day of each calendar month in the manner prescribed by the Tax Commissioner, true, correct, and sworn reports covering, for the last preceding calendar month, the number of cigarettes purchased, from whom purchased, the specific kinds and brands thereof, the manufacturer, if known, and such other matters and in such detail as the Tax Commissioner may require.

(2)(a) Each manufacturer and importer that sells cigarettes in or into the state shall, within fifteen days following the end of each month, file a report in the manner prescribed by the Tax Commissioner and certify to the state that the report is complete and accurate.

(b) The report shall contain the following information: The total number of cigarettes sold by that manufacturer or importer in or into the state during that month and identifying by name and number of cigarettes, (i) the manufacturers of those cigarettes, (ii) the brand families of those cigarettes, and (iii) the purchasers of those cigarettes. A manufacturer's or importer's report shall include cigarettes sold in or into the state through its sales entity affiliate.

(c) The requirements of this subsection shall be satisfied and no further report shall be required under this section with respect to cigarettes if the manufacturer or importer timely submits to the Tax Commissioner the report or reports required to be submitted by it with respect to those cigarettes under 15 U.S.C. 376 to the Tax Commissioner and certifies to the state that the reports are complete and accurate.

(d) Upon request by the Tax Commissioner, a manufacturer or importer shall provide copies of all sales reports referenced in subdivisions (2)(a) and (b) of this section that it filed in other states.

(e) Each manufacturer and importer that sells cigarettes in or into the state shall either (i) submit its federal excise tax returns and all monthly operational reports on Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau Form 5210.5 and all adjustments, changes, and amendments to such reports to the Tax Commissioner no later than sixty days after the close of the quarter in which the returns were filed or (ii) submit to the United States Treasury a request or consent under section 6103(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 as defined in section 49-801.01 authorizing the federal Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau and, in the case of a foreign manufacturer or importer, the United States Customs Service to disclose the manufacturer's or importer's federal returns to the Tax Commissioner as of sixty days after the close of the quarter in which the returns were filed.

Laws 1947, c. 267, § 4, p. 862;

Laws 2002, LB 989, § 12;

Laws 2011, LB590, § 26;

Laws 2015, LB261, § 9;

Laws 2017, LB217, § 12;

Laws 2025, LB9, § 7.